Nevada, session 83, SB301.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 288.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.425 1. “Employee” means a person who:
(a) Is employed in the classified service of the State pursuant to
chapter 284 of NRS; [or]
(b) Is employed as a category I, II or III peace officer, as
defined in NRS 289.460, 289.470 and 289.480, respectively, in the
unclassified service of the State pursuant to chapter 284 of NRS;
or
(c) Is employed by the Nevada System of Higher Education in
the classified service of the State or is required to be paid in
accordance with the pay plan for the classified service of the State.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A managerial employee whose primary function, as
determined by the Board, is to administer and control the business
of any agency, board, bureau, commission, department, division,
elected officer or any other unit of the Executive Department and
who is vested with discretion and independent judgment with regard
to the general conduct and control of that agency, board, bureau,
commission, department, division, elected officer or unit;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) An elected official or any person appointed to fill a vacancy
in an elected office;
(c) A confidential employee;
(d) A temporary employee who is employed for a fixed period
of 4 months or less;
(e) A commissioned officer or an enlisted member of the
Nevada National Guard;
(f) Any person employed by the Nevada System of Higher
Education who is not in the classified service of the State or
required to be paid in accordance with the pay plan of the classified
service of the State; or
(g) Any person employed by the Public Employees’ Retirement
System who is required to be paid in accordance with the pay plan
of the classified service of the State.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)